Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 7 Search Warrants

Cross references. —

For authority of arresting officer to break open building in execution of warrant, see §

7-8-104

.

As to security against search and seizure, see art. 1, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to issuance of warrants by circuit courts and magistrates, see §§

5-9-133

and

5-9-208

.

As to search without warrant for wildlife unlawfully taken, see §

23-6-109

.

As to search warrants and administrative inspection warrants under Controlled Substances Act, see §§

35-7-1045

and

35-7-1046

.

As to procedure relating to search and seizure, see Rule 41, W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Searches and Seizures §§ 109 to 228.

Unlawful search as invasion of right of privacy, 14 ALR2d 750, 57 ALR3d 16.

Forfeiture of money seized in a search of premises used for gambling or lottery, 19 ALR2d 1228.

Propriety and legality of issuing only one search warrant to search more than one place or premises occupied by same person, 31 ALR2d 864.

Sufficiency of description in search warrant of automobile or other conveyance to be searched, 47 ALR2d 1444.

Propriety or lawfulness of seizure, not incident to arrest, of papers, documents, letters, books and records not described in warrant, 79 ALR2d 1005.

Lawfulness of nonconsensual search and seizure, without warrant, prior to arrest, 89 ALR2d 715.

Sufficiency of the affidavit in regard to time of occurrence of events justifying issuance of warrant, 100 ALR2d 525.

Validity of consent to search given by one in custody of officers, 9 ALR3d 858.

Propriety of considering hearsay or other incompetent evidence in establishing probable cause for the issuance of search warrant, 10 ALR3d 359.

Sufficiency of description, in search warrant, of apartment or room to be searched in multiple occupancy structure, 11 ALR3d 1330.

Right of search and seizure incident to lawful arrest, without a search warrant, 19 ALR3d 727.

“Furtive” movement or gesture as justifying police search, 45 ALR3d 581.

Disputation of truth of matters stated in affidavit in support of search warrant — modern cases, 24 ALR4th 1266.

Searches and seizures: reasonable expectation of privacy in contents of garbage or trash receptacle, 28 ALR4th 1219.

Searches and seizures: validity of searches conducted as condition of entering public premises — state cases, 28 ALR4th 1250.

Lawfulness of warrantless search of purse or wallet of person arrested or suspected of crime, 29 ALR4th 771.

Propriety of state or local government health officer's warrantless search — post-Camara cases, 53 ALR4th 1168.

Seizure of books, documents or other papers under search warrant not describing such items, 54 ALR4th 391.

Search and seizure of telephone company records pertaining to subscriber as violation of subscriber's constitutional rights, 76 ALR4th 536.

Search and seizure of bank records pertaining to customer as violation of customer's rights under state law, 33 ALR5th 453.

Sufficiency of description in warrant of person to be searched, 43 ALR5th 1.

Application of “plain-feel” exception to warrant requirements — state cases, 50 ALR5th 581.

Propriety of search of nonoccupant visitor's belongings pursuant to warrant issued for another's premises, 51 ALR5th 375.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of adult defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's minor child — state cases, 51 ALR5th 425.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in warrantless search of rental property authorized by lessor of such property — state cases, 61 ALR5th 1.

Belief that burglary is in progress or has recently been committed as exigent circumstance justifying warrantless search of premises, 64 ALR5th 637.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's spouse (resident or nonresident) — state cases, 65 ALR5th 407.

Propriety in federal prosecution of severance of partially valid search warrant and limitation of suppression to items seized under invalid portions of warrant, 69 ALR Fed 522.

79 C.J.S. Searches and Seizures §§ 63 to 84, 91 to 97, 112 to 117.

§ 7-7-101.
Authority to issue; grounds.

Any district judge, district court commissioner, circuit judge or magistrate authorized pursuant to W.S. 5-9-208(a), (b) or (c)(xv) or 5-9-212(a)(ix) may issue a search warrant to search for and seize any property:

Stolen or embezzled in violation of law;

Designed or intended for use or which is or has been used as the means of committing a criminal offense;

Possessed, controlled, or designed or intended for use or which is or has been used in violation of any law; or

When the property or things to be seized consist of any item, or constitute any evidence which tends to show a crime has been committed, or tends to show that a particular person has committed a crime.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 13; R.S. 1887, § 3168; R.S. 1899, § 5442; C.S. 1910, § 6313; C.S. 1920, § 7609; R.S. 1931, § 33-1801; Laws 1941, ch. 92, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 10-201; W.S. 1957, § 7-148; W.S. 1977, §

7-7-101

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2001, ch. 164, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to district court commissioners, see §

5-3-301

.

As to magistrates, see §

5-9-208

.

As to grounds for issuance of search warrants under the rules, see Rule 41, W.R. Cr. P.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “or any justice of the peace” following “5-9-212(a)(ix)”; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Article, Warranting Legislative Action: The Search for Wyoming Court Authority To Issue Extraterritorial Search Warrants for Electronically Stored Information,16 Wyo. L. Rev. 199 (2016).

Jurisdiction of justices. —

Justices of the peace did not have jurisdiction to issue search warrants for intoxicating liquor under the former prohibition laws of the state, such jurisdiction not having been given either by statute, the state constitution or the common law. State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1920) (decided prior to 1987 revision of this title).

County court

had jurisdiction to issue a warrant to search the murder scene after the case had been transferred to the district court. Ryan v. State, 988 P.2d 46,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1999).

Game warden can obtain unemployment insurance records. —

A game warden who complies with the strict requirements of obtaining a search warrant from a judge or a court commissioner can obtain confidential records of the division of unemployment insurance. Wyoming Dep't of Employment, Div. of Unemployment Ins. v. Patrick, 818 P.2d 54,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of anticipatory search warrants — state cases, 67 ALR5th 361.

Civilian participation in execution of search warrant as affecting legality of search, 68 ALR5th 549.

Application to extension telephones of title III of the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 (18 USC § 2510 et seq.), pertaining to interception of wire communications, 58 ALR Fed 594.

Authority of district court to order telephone company to assist law enforcement agents in tracing telephone calls, 58 ALR Fed 719.

Delay in sealing or failure to seal tape or wire recording as required by 18 USC § 2518(8)(a) as ground for suppression of such recording at trial, 62 ALR Fed 636.

§ 7-7-102.
Procedures governed by rules.

Except as provided by W.S.

7-7-105

, the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure shall govern procedures relating to the issuance, form, execution and return of search warrants and procedures relating to motions to return unlawfully seized property and to suppress evidence.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 14; R.S. 1887, § 3169; R.S. 1899, § 5443; C.S. 1910, § 6314; C.S. 1920, § 7610; R.S. 1931, § 33-1802; C.S. 1945, § 10-202; W.S. 1957, § 7-149; W.S. 1977, §

7-7-102

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to procedures related to search warrants, see Rule 41, W.R. Cr. P.

Affidavit not showing probable cause insufficient. —

Affidavit for search and seizure not showing probable cause and made merely upon the belief of the affiant was insufficient, and a warrant for search and seizure issued thereon was invalid. Wiggin v. State, 28 Wyo. 480, 206 P. 373,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1922).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of, and admissibility of evidence discovered in, search authorized by judge over telephone, 38 ALR4th 1145.

§ 7-7-103.
Disposition of property.

Except as otherwise provided by law, property seized pursuant to a search warrant shall be disposed of as follows:

If the defendant is convicted:

Property which was stolen or embezzled shall be returned to the owner;

Other property shall be destroyed or otherwise disposed of as directed by the court.

If the criminal charges against the defendant are dismissed or he is acquitted, the property shall be returned to the owner or otherwise disposed of as directed by the court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 19; R.S. 1887, § 3174; R.S. 1899, § 5448; C.S. 1910, § 6319; C.S. 1920, § 7615; R.S. 1931, § 33-1807; C.S. 1945, § 10-207; W.S. 1957, § 7-154; W.S. 1977, § 7-7-107; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of search of nonoccupant visitor's belongings pursuant to warrant issued for another's premises, 51 ALR5th 375.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of adult defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's minor child — state cases, 51 ALR5th 425.

§ 7-7-104.
Authority of officer to break open building in execution of warrant.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, an officer executing a search warrant may break a door or window of any building described in the warrant if he is not admitted after he has announced his authority and purpose.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-7-108; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of execution of search warrant at nighttime, 41 ALR5th 171.

What constitutes compliance with knock-and-announce rule in search of private premises — State cases, 85 ALR5th 1.

§ 7-7-105.
Applicability of more specific provisions.

Notwithstanding any provision of W.S.

7-7-101

through

7-7-104

, specific procedures contained in another statute governing search and seizure, the issuance and execution of search warrants or the disposition to be made of seized property shall govern in those circumstances to which the more specific statute applies.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-7-109; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 5.

Article, Warranting Legislative Action: The Search for Wyoming Court Authority To Issue Extraterritorial Search Warrants for Electronically Stored Information,
16 Wyo. L. Rev. 199 (2016).